Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.035

Salary and wage deductions for contributions to charitable agencies—"United Fund" defined—Includes Washington state combined fund drive.

For the purpose of RCW 41.04.035 and 41.04.036 "United Fund" means the organization conducting the single, annual, consolidated effort to secure funds for distribution to agencies engaged in charitable and public health, welfare and service purposes, which is commonly known as the United Fund or the Washington state combined fund drive.

[ 2002 c 61 s 1; 1957 c 208 s 1.]